src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no






! ===== !
! Verbs !
! ===== !


!! !!!Even syllabled verbs

LEXICON V_EVEN_E !båhtet
+V:     V_EVEN_E_STR ;
+V:e^WG V_EVEN_E_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á%>0 #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:e%>behtin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:e%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>behtit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:e%>t # ; 
+GerII:e%>min # ; !aka: +Actio+Ess ?
+PrfPrc:á%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:o%>0 # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det?
+Vsubst:e%>m #; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v^V2E2AA #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>0^V2E2AA #;
:^IJ%>j V_EVEN_E_WK_J ; !suffixes with -j-element that trigger e->i in V2

+Imprt+Sg2:%>0 #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
+ConNeg:%>0 # ; 
+Vgen:%>0 #;  
!+Sup:%>tjit # ;
!+Pot:%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; !update later
!+Pot:u%>tj V_ODD ; !but should only trigger +Ind+Prs forms!

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_WK_J
+Ind+Prt+Sg3: #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:men #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:den #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3: 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:me #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:de #;



LEXICON V_EVEN_A !dahkat
+V:     V_EVEN_A_STR ;
+V:a^WG V_EVEN_A_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_A_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:a%>0 #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:a%>behtin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:a%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:a%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:a%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>behtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:a%>t # ; 
+GerII:a%>min # ;
+PrfPrc:a%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:a%>0 # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det?
!+Vsubst:a%>m #; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_A_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>0 #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;

+Imprt+Sg2:%>0 #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
!+Sup:%>tjit # ;
+ConNeg:%>0 # ; 
!+Pot:%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; !update later
+Vgen:%>0 #;  
!+Pot:u%>tj V_ODD ; !but should only trigger +Ind+Prs forms!



LEXICON V_EVEN_O !viessot, årrot
+V:     V_EVEN_O_STR ;
+V:o^WG V_EVEN_O_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_O_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:u%>0 #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:u%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:o%>behtin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:o%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:o%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:o%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>behtit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:u%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:u%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:u%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:u%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:o%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:u%>t #;

+Inf:o%>t # ; 
+GerII:o%>min # ;
+PrfPrc:u%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:o%>0 # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det?
+Vsubst:o%>m #; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_O_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>0 #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;

+Imprt+Sg2:%>0 #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
!+Sup:%>tjit # ;
+ConNeg:%>0 # ; 
!+Pot:%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; !update later
+Vgen:%>0 #;  
!+Pot:u%>tj V_ODD ; !but should only trigger +Ind+Prs forms!


LEXICON V_EVEN_Å !viessot, årrot
+V:     V_EVEN_Å_STR ;
+V:å^WG V_EVEN_Å_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_Å_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á%>0 #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:å%>behtin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:å%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:å%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:å%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:å%>behtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:å%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%>0 #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:å%>t # ; 
+GerII:å%>min # ;
+PrfPrc:å%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:å%>0 # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det?
!+Vsubst:å%>m #; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_Å_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>0 #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;

+Imprt+Sg2:%>0 #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
!+Sup:%>tjit # ;
+ConNeg:%>0 # ; 
!+Pot:%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; !update later
+Vgen:%>0 #;  
!+Pot:u%>tj V_ODD ; !but should only trigger +Ind+Prs forms!




!! !!!Odd syllabled verbs

LEXICON V_ODD !ságastit
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:a%>v #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:a%>0 #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:a%>0 #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>0 #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:ä%>hppen #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%>ba #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:i%>p #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:i%>hppit #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%>0 #; 

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%>0 #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i%>j #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:i%>jmen #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:i%>jden #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:i%>jga #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:i%>jme #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:i%>jde #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+V+Imprt+Sg2:e%>0 #; 
+V+Imprt+Du2:e%>hten # ; 
+V+Imprt+Pl2:i%>httit #;

+V+Inf:i%>t # ; 
+V+GerII:e%>min # ;
+V+PrfPrc:a%>m # ;
+V+ConNeg:e%>0 # ; 
!+V+PrsPrc:o%>0 # ; 
!+V+Vsubst:a%>m #; 
!+V+GerI:a%>din # ;  
!+V+Sup:a%>tjit # ;
!+V+Pot:o%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; !update later
!+V+Vgen:e%>0 #;  




!! !!!contracted verbs

LEXICON V_CONTR !välldut, tjerrut
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>0 #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ja #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>jin #; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>bähttin #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>ba #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>p #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>bihttit #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ji #; 

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jiv #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>ji #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmin #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jdin #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>jin #; 

+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>0 #; 
!+V+Imprt+Du2:%>hten # ; 
!+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>httit #;

+V+Inf:%>t # ; 
!+V+GerII:%>min # ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>m # ;
+V+ConNeg:%>0 # ; 
!+V+PrsPrc:%>0 # ; 
!+V+Vsubst:%>m #; 
!+V+GerI:%>din # ;  
!+V+Sup:%>tjit # ;
!+V+Pot:%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; !update later
!+V+Vgen:%>0 #;  







!! !!!Auxiliaries

LEXICON LE !!= * @CODE@ 
lä+V+Ind+Prs: LEPRS ; 
lä+V+Ind+Prt: LEPRT ; 
lä+V+Ind+Pot: LEPOT ;
lä+V+PrfPrc:lam # ; !fattas negformer av le 
lä+V+Inf:årrot # ; !infinitive
lä+V+ConNeg:lä # ; !connegative

LEXICON LEPRS !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:läv # ; 
+Sg1+Use/NG:lev # ; 
+Sg2:lä # ;  
+Sg2+Use/NG:le # ;  
+Sg2:l # ; !enclitic (only attaches to vowel-final preceding word)
+Sg3:lä # ; 
+Sg3:l # ; !enclitic (only attaches to vowel-final preceding word)
!+Sg3:le # ; 
+Du1:lin # ; 
!+Du1:len # ; 
+Du2:lihpen # ; 
+Du2:lähppen # ;  
+Du3:läbá # ; 
+Pl1:läp # ; 
+Pl1:lip # ; 
!+Pl1:lep # ; 
+Pl2:lihpit # ; 
+Pl2:lehpit # ; 
+Pl3:lä # ;
+Pl3:l # ; !enclitic (only attaches to vowel-final preceding word)

LEXICON LEPRT !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:lijjiv    # ; 
+Sg1:lidjiv    # ;  
+Sg2:lijji    # ; 
+Sg2:lidji    # ;  
+Sg3:lij    # ; 
+Du1:lijmen # ; 
+Du1:liejme # ; 
+Du2:lijden # ;
+Du2:liejde # ; 
+Du3:lijga # ;
+Du3:liejga # ; 
+Pl1:lijme # ; 
+Pl1:liejme # ; 
+Pl2:lijde # ;
+Pl2:liejde # ; 
+Pl3:lidjin    # ;  
+Pl3:lijjin    # ; 
+Pl3:lin    # ; 
