src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb   !!= * __@CODE@__ is the main lexicon
LE "copula/auxiliary verb" ; !!= * @CODE@ 
buallát:bu^Ollá V_CONTR "burn, be on fire" ; ! no. 3303
dagaduvvut:dagaduvvu V_CONTR "be done" ; ! no. 90154
dullit:dulli V_CONTR "heat, stoke" ; ! no. 90642
grävvit:grä2vvi V_CONTR "bury" ; ! no. 90646
gärrdut:gä2rrdu V_CONTR "twist, spin" ; ! no. 789
lenit:leni V_CONTR "be worth it" ; ! no. 3698
lähppit:lä2hppi V_CONTR "make cheese" ; ! no. 3029
nagerduvvut:nagerduvvu V_CONTR "become sleepy" ; ! no. 1232
rejjsit:rejjsi V_CONTR "trip, journey" ; ! no. 6028
sillgit:sillgi V_CONTR "poison" ; ! no. 4249
smäjjvit:smä2jjvi V_CONTR "grind finely" ; ! no. 5607
sälltit:sä2llti V_CONTR "salt" ; ! no. 3940
vádtsát:vádtsá V_CONTR "head out, start going, begin walking" ; ! no. 90394
bájjat+Use/NG:bájj V_EVEN_A "let, cause" ; ! no. 90472
bävvkat:bievvk V_EVEN_A "detonate" ; ! no. 3589
dudnat:dudn V_EVEN_A "roar" ; ! no. 3302
gállgat:gállg V_EVEN_A "loosen, let loose" ; ! no. 523
gullat:gull V_EVEN_A "feel" ; ! no. 90732
hudjat:hudj V_EVEN_A "complain, question, be displeased" ; ! no. 846
jåksådallat:jåksådall V_EVEN_A "catch up" ; ! no. 5548
máhttsat:máhtts V_EVEN_A "turn around" ; ! no. 1116
njammat:njamm V_EVEN_A "suck, suckle" ; ! no. 3432
ravvgat:ravvg V_EVEN_A "trip, fall down" ; ! no. 1393
sárrat:sárr V_EVEN_A "breathe heavily, pant (for animals)" ; ! no. 2986
sjnjuvvat:sjnjuvv V_EVEN_A "kindle (a fire)" ; ! no. 1591
sustudallat:sustudall V_EVEN_A "sniff (used for dogs)" ; ! no. 4648
tsaggat:tsagg V_EVEN_A "fasten tightly, brace, support (eg. reindeer hide)" ; ! no. 2658
ballagåhtet:ballagåht V_EVEN_E "begin to become afraid" ; ! no. 5509
bállet:báll V_EVEN_E "dig, grub" ; ! no. 134
buäkktet:bu^Okkt V_EVEN_E "come with something" ; ! no. 3036
bäjjstet:biejjst V_EVEN_E "destroy" ; ! no. 2568
duvvdet:duvvd V_EVEN_E "drive, push ahead reindeer" ; ! no. 405
galbmegåhtet:galbmegåht V_EVEN_E "begin to freeze" ; ! no. 6000
gibbnjet:gibbnj V_EVEN_E "hang up" ; ! no. 603
gåddet:gådd V_EVEN_E "kill, slay" ; ! no. 4879
iltjagahttet:iltjagahtt V_EVEN_E "be stubborn, willful" ; ! no. 893
låpptet:låppt V_EVEN_E "finish something off, use something up" ; ! no. 1095
njuvvdet:njuvvd V_EVEN_E "knead, press" ; ! no. 1309
skávvget:skávvg V_EVEN_E "reprimand" ; ! no. 2480
tsáhket:tsáhk V_EVEN_E "stuff into" ; ! no. 1996
vuodjet:vu^Odj V_EVEN_E "drive" ; ! no. 2371
åvdånahttet:åvdånahtt V_EVEN_E "propose, present" ; ! no. 5815
bissot:biss V_EVEN_O "remain" ; ! no. 2711
dadnegårrot:dadne#gårr V_EVEN_O "embroider using tin wire" ; ! no. 90764
dållvot:dållv V_EVEN_O "try to catch up" ; ! no. 3007
gáhtot:gáht V_EVEN_O "be gone, disappear" ; ! no. 503
guohtot:gu^Oht V_EVEN_O "graze" ; ! no. 686
gållot:gåll V_EVEN_O "feel cold" ; ! no. 3012
hávvrot:hávvr V_EVEN_O "tear apart (for a predator killing a reindeer)" ; ! no. 3194
krápptjot:krápptj V_EVEN_O "soften leather gloves" ; ! no. 4385
luaddot:lu^Odd V_EVEN_O "chop (firewood)" ; ! no. 5274
mållsot:målls V_EVEN_O "exchange, trade" ; ! no. 1203
sárrjot:sárrj V_EVEN_O "hurt" ; ! no. 1511
släjjvot:sliejjv V_EVEN_O "miss when throwing a lasso" ; ! no. 2429
tjuarrvot:tju^Orrv V_EVEN_O "call, call out" ; ! no. 1915
villsjot:villsj V_EVEN_O "look around (uncomforatbly)" ; ! no. 90673
båsskåt:båssk V_EVEN_Å "poke with a needle or stick" ; ! no. 3299
dållgåt:dållg V_EVEN_Å "ride behind, be pulled behind" ; ! no. 420
gådtjåt:gådtj V_EVEN_Å "urinate, pee" ; ! no. 775
gåhtsåt:gåhts V_EVEN_Å "slow down" ; ! no. 741
gållgåt:gållg V_EVEN_Å "flow, run, drift" ; ! no. 755
gåssåt:gåss V_EVEN_Å "cough" ; ! no. 773
hållåt:håll V_EVEN_Å "say, speak" ; ! no. 856
jårråt:jårr V_EVEN_Å "fall over" ; ! no. 2524
låhkåt:låhk V_EVEN_Å "read" ; ! no. 1089
njållgåt:njållg V_EVEN_Å "trot (for reindeer)" ; ! no. 1312
råggåt:rågg V_EVEN_Å "dig, dig up" ; ! no. 1454
smållåt:småll V_EVEN_Å "break into pieces" ; ! no. 5156
såhpåt:såhp V_EVEN_Å "slice meat off a bone" ; ! no. 1817
åhppåt:åhpp V_EVEN_Å "learn" ; ! no. 2247
barrjedit:barrjed V_ODD "swear, curse" ; ! no. 2914
buddusit:buddus V_ODD "stuff, plug, block" ; ! no. 206
dájjsalit:dájjsal V_ODD "become hysterical" ; ! no. 4718
duvdistit:duvdist V_ODD "drive a reindeer herd" ; ! no. 6057
garkagit:garkag V_ODD "become rancid" ; ! no. 4990
gielestit:gielest V_ODD "lie, tell an untruth" ; ! no. 614
hartsastit:hartsast V_ODD "execute by hanging" ; ! no. 3707
jårådit:jåråd V_ODD "fall over repeatedly" ; ! no. 4923
mulsudit:mulsud V_ODD "change clothes" ; ! no. 1180
rávaldit:rávald V_ODD "talk nonsense" ; ! no. 1392
sjåbbåldit:sjåbbåld V_ODD "speak unclearly" ; ! no. 1608
sähkudit:sä2hkud V_ODD "saw" ; ! no. 1834
tsigástit:tsigást V_ODD "nag persistently and insistently" ; ! no. 2002
ådåstit+Use/NG:ådåst V_ODD "renew, update" ; ! no. 90454
